Idaho, session 2025, S1203.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Domestic Violence Council $3,000,000 from the General Fund to be expended
for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026, for the purpose of children's advocacy centers.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.